Florida, session 2026, HB1507.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.9079, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.9079 Medicaid dental pilot program for persons with
disabilities in Region B.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "persons with
disabilities" means Medicaid-eligible individuals who:
(a) Receive Supplemental Security Income on the basis of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1507-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1507 2026
disability;
(b) Are enrolled in a home and community-based services
waiver program under s. 1915(c) of the Social Security Act; or
(c) Meet federal disability criteria under 42 U.S.C. s.
1382c(a)(3) as determined by the Social Security Administration
or the state Medicaid program.
(2) The agency shall establish and operate a 3-year
Medicaid dental pilot program in Region B of the Statewide
Medicaid Managed Care program to provide enhanced dental
services to persons with disabilities.
(3) Participation in the pilot program is limited to
persons with disabilities who reside in Region B and are
enrolled in the state Medicaid program.
(4) Dental services provided under the pilot program must
include:
(a) Routine diagnostic and preventive care, including
examinations, cleanings, and radiographs.
(b) Basic dental services, including fillings and
extractions.
(c) Major dental services, including root canals, crowns,
and dentures and other dental prostheses.
(d) Emergency dental services.
(e) Any additional dental services that the agency
determines are necessary to promote oral health and prevent
disease.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1507-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1507 2026

Services provided under this subsection supplement and do not
replace the dental benefits available under ss. 409.906 and
409.973.
(5) The agency shall reimburse providers of dental
services under the pilot program at a rate equivalent to 80
percent of the 50th percentile of the usual, customary, and
reasonable fees as determined by the American Dental Association
or a comparable benchmark approved by the agency.
(6) The pilot program must be delivered through at least
two licensed dental managed care organizations that meet agency
standards and have demonstrated experience in providing dental
services to persons with disabilities.
(7) The agency shall submit any Medicaid state plan
amendments or federal waiver applications necessary to implement
the pilot program.
(8)(a) The agency shall collect data on:
1. Access to dental care.
2. Utilization of services.
3. Reimbursement expenditures.
4. Oral health outcomes for participants.
(b) By January 1, 2028, the agency shall submit a report
to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives evaluating the effectiveness of the
pilot program and recommending whether the pilot program should
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1507-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1507 2026
be expanded statewide.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2028, unless reviewed
and saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1507-00